Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 13.1-604.1.
Filings with the Commission pursuant to reorganization.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in §

13.1-604

,

13.1-619

,

13.1-707

,

13.1-718

,

13.1-722.4

,

13.1-722.11

, or

13.1-742

, whenever, pursuant to any applicable statute of the United States relating to reorganizations of corporations, a plan of reorganization of a corporation has been confirmed by the decree or order of a court of competent jurisdiction, the corporation may put into effect and carry out the plan and decrees of the court relative thereto, (i) through one or more amendments to the corporation’s articles of incorporation containing terms and conditions permitted by this chapter; (ii) through a plan of merger, share exchange, domestication, or conversion; or (iii) through dissolution or termination, without action by the board of directors or shareholders to carry out the plan of reorganization ordered or decreed by such court of competent jurisdiction under federal statute.

The individual or individuals designated by the court shall file with the Commission articles of amendment, merger, share exchange, domestication, conversion, dissolution, or termination, which, in addition to the matters otherwise required or permitted by law to be set forth therein, shall set forth:

The name of the corporation;

Any provision relating to the amendment or amendments; plan of merger, share exchange, domestication, or conversion; or dissolution or termination approved by the court;

The name of the court and the date of the court’s order or decree approving the amendment, plan of merger, share exchange, domestication, conversion, dissolution, or termination;

The title and case number, if any, of the reorganization proceeding in which the order or decree was entered; and

A statement that the court had jurisdiction of the proceeding under federal statute.

If the Commission finds that the articles of amendment, merger, share exchange, domestication, conversion, dissolution, or termination comply with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall issue a certificate of amendment, merger, share exchange, domestication, conversion, dissolution, or termination.

This section does not apply after entry of a final decree in the reorganization proceeding even though the court retains jurisdiction of the proceeding for limited purposes unrelated to consummation of the reorganization plan.

History.

1988, c. 194; 2005, c. 765; 2012, c. 130; 2019, c. 734.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 734, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 5 provides: “That until July 1, 2021, the term ‘conversion,’ when used in any provision of the first enactment of this act, shall be construed to mean ‘entity conversion.’ ”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 in subsection A substituted “chapter” for “Act” and made a stylistic change.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 130, throughout the section, inserted “entity conversion” following “share exchange” and “termination” following “dissolution”; in subsection A, substituted “§

13.1-604

,

13.1-619

,

13.1-710

,

13.1-711

,

13.1-720

,

13.1-722.12

,

13.1-743

, or

13.1-750

” for “§

13.1-604

,

13.1-619

,

13.1-720

or

13.1-743

” and “one or more amendments” for “an amendment or amendments”; substituted “Any provision relating to the amendment or amendments” for “The text of each amendment” in subdivision B 2; in subdivision B 3, inserted “name of the court and the” and deleted “articles of” preceding “amendment”; inserted “and case number, if any” in subdivision B 4; and made related changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 substituted “domestication, conversion” for “entity conversion” throughout; in subsection A, substituted “13.1-604,

13.1-619

,

13.1-707

,

13.1-718

,

13.1-722.4

,

13.1-722.11

, or

13.1-742

” for “13.1-604,

13.1-619

,

13.1-710

,

13.1-711

,

13.1-720

,

13.1-722.12

,

13.1-743

, or

13.1-750

”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 39 (2013).

§ 13.1-605.
Issuance of certificate by Commission; recordation of documents.

Whenever this chapter conditions the effectiveness of a document upon the issuance of a certificate by the Commission to evidence the effectiveness of the document, the Commission shall by order issue the certificate if it finds that the document complies with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid. The Commission shall admit any such certificate to record in its office.

Whenever the Commission is directed to admit any document to record in its office, it shall cause it to be spread upon its record books or to be recorded or reproduced in any other manner the Commission may deem suitable. Except as otherwise provided by law, the Commission may furnish information from and provide access to any of its records by any means the Commission may deem suitable.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-126; 1956, c. 428; 1982, c. 375; 1984, c. 295; 1985, c. 522; 1986, c. 231; 1987, c. 183; 1988, c. 405; 1989, c. 152.

Law Review.

For survey on business and corporate law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 491 (1989).

For article, “Administrative Aspects of State Corporation Law,” see 28 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (1994).

§ 13.1-606.
Effective time and date of document.

Except as otherwise provided in §

13.1-607

and Article 1.1 (§

13.1-614.1

et seq.), a certificate issued by the Commission is effective at the time such certificate is issued, unless the certificate relates to articles filed with the Commission and the articles state that the certificate shall become effective at a later time or date specified in the articles. In that event, the certificate shall become effective at the earlier of the time and date so specified or 11:59 p.m. on the fifteenth day after the date on which the certificate is issued by the Commission. If a delayed effective date is specified, but no time is specified, the effective time shall be 12:01 a.m. on the date specified. Any other document filed with the Commission shall be effective when accepted for filing unless otherwise provided for in this chapter.

Notwithstanding subsection A, any certificate that has a delayed effective time or date shall not become effective if, prior to the effective time and date, a statement of cancellation signed by each party to the articles to which the certificate relates is delivered to the Commission for filing. If the Commission finds that the statement of cancellation complies with the requirements of law, it shall, by order, cancel the certificate.

A statement of cancellation shall contain:

The name of the corporation;

The name of the articles and the date on which the articles were filed with the Commission;

The time and date on which the Commission’s certificate becomes effective; and

A statement that the articles are being canceled in accordance with this section.

Notwithstanding subsection A, for purposes of §§

13.1-630

and

13.1-762

, any certificate that has a delayed effective date shall be deemed to be effective when the certificate is issued.

For articles with a delayed effective date and time, the effective date and time shall be Eastern time.

History.

1985, c. 522; 2019, c. 734.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, inserted “Except as otherwise provided in §

13.1-607

and Article 1.1 (§

13.1-614.1

et seq.)” at the beginning, and inserted “If a delayed effective date is specified, but no time is specified, the effective time shall be 12:01 a.m. on the date specified”; rewrote subsection B, which read: “Notwithstanding subsection A of this section, any certificate that has a delayed effective time and date shall not become effective if, prior to the effective time and date, the parties to the articles to which the certificate relates file a request for cancellation with the Commission and the Commission, by order, cancels the certificate”; added subsections C and E; and made stylistic changes.

§ 13.1-607.
Correcting filed articles.

Articles filed with the Commission may be corrected if (i) the articles contain an inaccuracy; (ii) the articles were not properly authorized or defectively signed, attested, sealed, verified, or acknowledged; or (iii) the electronic transmission of the articles to the Commission was defective.

Articles are corrected by filing with the Commission articles of correction that:

Set forth the name of the corporation prior to filing;

Describe the articles to be corrected, including their effective date;

Specify the inaccuracy or defect to be corrected;

Correct the inaccuracy or defect; and

State that the corporation authorized the correction and the date of such authorization.

If the Commission finds that the articles of correction comply with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall issue a certificate of correction. Upon the issuance of a certificate of correction by the Commission, the articles of correction shall become effective as of the effective date and time of the articles they correct except as to persons relying on the uncorrected articles and adversely affected by the correction. As to those persons, articles of correction are effective upon the issuance of the certificate of correction.

No articles of correction shall be accepted by the Commission when received more than 30 days after the effective date of the certificate relating to the articles to be corrected.

History.

1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2007, c. 165; 2008, cc. 91, 509; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765, in subsection A, inserted (i) preceding, and deleted (i) following, “the articles,” and substituted “inaccuracy” for “incorrect statement or,” inserted “the articles” following (ii), added clause (iii) and made a related change; divided former subdivision B 1 into present subdivisions B 1, B 1 a, and B 1 b, substituted “inaccuracy” for “incorrect statement” and “defect” for “defective execution” in B 1 b and made stylistic changes; and substituted “30 days” for “nine days” in subsection D.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 165, in subsection A, deleted “domestic or foreign” preceding “corporation” near the beginning and inserted “to the Commission” near the end; rewrote subsection B; inserted “and time” in the first sentence of subsection C; and substituted “correction may be filed with the Commission” for “correction shall be accepted by the Commission when received” in subsection D.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 91 inserted “not properly authorized or” preceding “defectively” in clause (ii) of subsection A; and substituted “inaccurate or defective matter” for “inaccuracy and defect” in subdivisions B 3 and B 4.

The 2008 amendment by c. 509 substituted “shall be accepted by the Commission when received more” for “may be filed with the Commission more” in subsection D.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, deleted “The board of directors of a corporation may authorize correction of any” from the beginning, inserted “may be corrected” and substituted “signed” for “executed”; rewrote subsection B, which read: “Articles are corrected by filing with the Commission articles of correction setting forth: 1. The name of the corporation prior to filing; 2. A description of the articles to be corrected, including their effective date; 3. Each inaccurate or defective matter that is to be corrected; 4. The correction of each inaccurate or defective matter; and 5. A statement that the board of directors authorized the correction and the date of such authorization”; in subsection C, inserted the first sentence; and made stylistic changes.

§ 13.1-608.
Evidentiary effect of copy of filed document.

A certificate delivered with a copy of any document admitted to the records of the Commission, bearing the signature of the clerk of the Commission or a member of the staff of the office of the clerk, which in either case may be in facsimile, and the seal of the Commission, which may be in facsimile, is conclusive evidence that the document has been admitted to the records of the Commission.

History.

1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 deleted “or an assistant clerk,” inserted “or a member of the staff of the office of the clerk, which in either case may be in facsimile” following “the Commission,” inserted “which may be in facsimile” preceding “is conclusive.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 substituted “delivered with” for “attached to.”

§ 13.1-609.
Certificate of good standing.

Anyone may apply to the Commission to furnish a certificate of good standing for a domestic or foreign corporation.

The certificate of good standing shall state that the corporation is in good standing in the Commonwealth and shall set forth:

The domestic corporation’s corporate name or the foreign corporation’s corporate name and, if applicable, the designated name adopted for use in the Commonwealth;

That (i) the domestic corporation is duly incorporated under the law of the Commonwealth, the date of its incorporation, which is the original date of incorporation or formation of the domesticated or converted corporation if the corporation was domesticated or converted from a foreign jurisdiction or was converted from a domestic eligible entity, and the period of its duration if less than perpetual, or (ii) the foreign corporation is authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth; and

If requested, a list of all certificates relating to articles filed with the Commission that have been issued by the Commission with respect to such corporation and their respective effective dates.

A domestic corporation or a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth shall be deemed to be in good standing if:

All fees, fines, penalties, and interest assessed, imposed, charged or to be collected by the Commission pursuant to this chapter have been paid except for any annual registration fee that is not due;

An annual report required by §

13.1-775

has been delivered to and accepted by the Commission; and

No certificate of dissolution, certificate of withdrawal, or order of reinstatement prohibiting the domestic corporation from engaging in business until it changes its corporate name has been issued or such certificate or prohibition has not become effective or no longer is in effect.

The certificate may state any other facts of record in the office of the clerk of the Commission that may be requested by the applicant.

Subject to any qualification stated in the certificate, a certificate of good standing issued by the Commission may be relied upon as conclusive evidence that the domestic or foreign corporation is in good standing in the Commonwealth.

History.

1985, c. 522; 1988, c. 405; 1993, c. 60; 2005, c. 765; 2006, c. 663; 2019, c. 734; 2020, c. 1226; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” in subdivision B 2 and subsection E; and deleted “or Title 12.1” following “chapter” in subdivision C 1.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 663, in subdivision C 3, inserted “or order of reinstatement prohibiting the domestic corporation from engaging in business until it changes its corporate name” and made a related change and inserted “or prohibition.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection B, inserted “of good standing”; in subdivision B 2, inserted “which is the original date of incorporation of the domesticated corporation if the corporation was domesticated from a foreign jurisdiction”; in subdivision C 1, added “except for any annual registration fee that is not due” at the end; and in subdivision C 3, inserted “has not become effective or”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1226, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “and, if applicable, the designated name adopted for use in this the Commonwealth” for “used in this Commonwealth” in subdivision B 1; in subdivision B 2, inserted “or formation” and “or converted” twice in clause (i).

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, added “or was converted from a domestic eligible entity” in subdivision B 2. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 13.1-610.
Notices and other communications.

For purposes of this chapter, except for notice to or from the Commission:

A notice shall be in writing except that oral notice of any meeting of the board of directors may be given if expressly authorized by the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

Unless otherwise agreed between the sender and the recipient, words in a notice or other communication under this chapter shall be in the English language. A notice or other communication may be given by any method of delivery, except that electronic transmissions shall be in accordance with this section. If the methods of delivery are impracticable, a notice or other communication may be given by a broad non-exclusionary dissemination to the public, which may include a newspaper of general circulation in the area where the notice is intended to be given, or by radio, television, or other form of public communication in the area where the notice is intended to be given or other methods of distribution that the corporation has previously identified to its shareholders.

A notice or other communication to a domestic or foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth may be delivered to the corporation’s registered agent at its registered office or to the secretary at the corporation’s principal office shown in its most recent annual report or, in the case of a foreign corporation that has not yet delivered an annual report, in its application for a certificate of authority.

A notice or other communication may be delivered by electronic transmission if consented to by the recipient or if otherwise authorized by subsection B.

Any consent under subdivision 4 may be revoked by the person who consented by written or electronic notice to the person to whom the consent was delivered. Any such consent is deemed revoked if (i) the corporation is unable to deliver two consecutive electronic transmissions given by the corporation in accordance with such consent and (ii) such inability becomes known to the secretary or an assistant secretary of the corporation or to the transfer agent or other person responsible for the giving of notice or other communications; however, the inadvertent failure to treat such inability as a revocation shall not invalidate any meeting or other action.

Unless otherwise agreed between the sender and the recipient, an electronic transmission is received when:

It enters an information processing system that the recipient has designated or uses for the purpose of receiving electronic transmissions or information of the type sent, and from which the recipient is able to retrieve the electronic transmission; and

It is in a form capable of being processed by that system.

A shareholder’s address shown on the corporation’s record of shareholders maintained by the corporation pursuant to subsection C of §

13.1-770

;

A director’s residence or usual place of business;

The corporation’s principal office; or

The corporation’s registered office when left with the corporation’s registered agent;

If mailed by United States mail postage prepaid and correctly addressed to a recipient other than a shareholder, the earliest of when it is actually received or: (i) if sent by registered or certified mail return receipt requested, the date shown on the return receipt, signed by or on behalf of the addressee; or (ii) five days after it is deposited in the United States mail;

If an electronic transmission, when it is received as provided in subdivision 7; and

If oral, when communicated.

Receipt of an electronic acknowledgment from an information processing system described in subdivision 6 a establishes that an electronic transmission was received. However, such receipt of an electronic acknowledgment, by itself, does not establish that the content sent corresponds to the content received.

An electronic transmission is received under this section even if no individual is aware of its receipt.

A notice or other communication, if in a comprehensible form or manner, is effective at the earliest of the following:

A notice or other communication may be in the form of an electronic transmission that cannot be directly reproduced in paper form by the recipient through an automated process used in conventional commercial practice only if (i) the electronic transmission is otherwise retrievable in perceivable form, and (ii) the sender and the recipient have consented in writing to the use of such form of electronic transmission.

If this chapter prescribes requirements for notices or other communications in particular circumstances, those requirements govern. If articles of incorporation or bylaws prescribe requirements for notices or other communications not inconsistent with this section or other provisions of this chapter, those requirements govern. The articles of incorporation or bylaws may authorize or require delivery of notices of meetings of directors by electronic transmission.

Without limiting the manner by which notice otherwise may be given effectively to shareholders, any notice to shareholders given by a public corporation, under any provision of this chapter, the articles of incorporation, or the bylaws, shall be effective if given in a manner permitted by the rules and regulations under the federal Securities Exchange Act of 1934, provided that the corporation has first received any affirmative written consent or implied consent required under those rules and regulations.

If any provisions of this chapter are deemed to modify, limit, or supersede the federal General Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq., the provisions of this chapter shall control to the maximum extent permitted by § 102(a)(2) of that federal act or any successor provision of that federal act.

Whenever notice would otherwise be required to be given under any provision of this chapter to a shareholder, the notice need not be given if:

Notices to shareholders of two consecutive annual meetings, and all notices of meetings during the period between two consecutive annual meetings, have been sent, other than by electronic transmission, to such shareholder at such shareholder’s address as shown on the records of the corporation and have been returned undeliverable or could not be delivered; or

All, but not less than two, distributions to shareholders during a 12-month period, or two consecutive distributions to shareholders during a period of more than 12 months, have been sent to such shareholder at such shareholder’s address as shown on the records of the corporation and have been returned undeliverable or could not be delivered.If any shareholder, for which notice is not required, delivers to the corporation a written notice setting forth such shareholder’s then-current address, the requirement that notice be given shall be reinstated.

a.

If in physical form, the earliest of when it is actually received or when it is left at:

b.

If mailed postage prepaid and correctly addressed to a shareholder, upon deposit in the United States mail;

History.

1985, c. 522; 2002, c. 285; 2003, c. 728; 2005, c. 765; 2007, c. 165; 2010, c. 782; 2019, c. 734; 2020, c. 1226; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

For the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, referred to above, see 15 U.S.C.S. § 78a et seq.

Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 285 added subsection H.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 728 added subsection I.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 added “except for notice to or from the Commission” at the end of the introductory language; added the last sentence in subsection A; in the first sentence of subsection B, inserted “mail or other method of delivery or by,” substituted “voicemail” for “telegraph, teletype,” and deleted “form of wire or wireless communications or by mail or private carrier,” in subsection C, deleted “when mail” following “is effective,” inserted “(i) upon deposit in the United States mail” following “is effective,” added “or (ii) when electronically transmitted to the shareholder in a manner authorized by the shareholder”; in subsection E, substituted “subsection C” for “subdivisions B and,” and deleted “of this section” preceding “written notice”; deleted “as evidenced by the postmarks” preceding “if mailed” and made a stylistic change in subdivision E 2.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 165 substituted “to the secretary of the corporation” for “to the corporation or its secretary” in subsection D.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 782 rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 redesignated former subsections A through L as subdivisions 1 through 12, respectively; in subdivision 2, inserted “under this chapter” preceding “by any method,” deleted “or sent” following “be given,” substituted “given by a broad non-exclusionary dissemination to the public, which may include” for “communicated by publication in,” and added “or other methods of distribution that the corporation has previously identified to its shareholders” at the end; in subdivision 4, inserted “otherwise” preceding “authorized”; in subdivision 5, inserted “however” following “other communications”; in subdivision 9 a (3), substituted “office” for “principal place of business”; in subdivision 9 c, inserted “return” preceding “receipt, signed” and inserted “United States”; in subdivision 12, inserted “federal”; added subdivision 13; updated internal references; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1226, effective July 1, 2021, redesignated former subdivisions 1 through 10 as subdivisions A 1 through A 10, and subdivisions 11 through 13 as subsections B through D; inserted “principal” in subdivision A 9 a (3); and updated an internal reference.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, added subsection E.
For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

Law Review.

For article reviewing changes in Virginia corporate and business law from June 2001 through May 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

For 2002 survey of Virginia technology law, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 341 (2002).

§ 13.1-610.1.
Householding.

A corporation shall be deemed to have delivered written notice or any other report or statement under this chapter, the articles of incorporation or the bylaws to all shareholders who share a common address as shown on the corporation’s current record of shareholders if:

The corporation delivers one copy of the notice, report or statement to the common address;

The corporation addresses the notice, report or statement to those shareholders either as a group or to each of those shareholders individually or to the shareholders in a form to which each of those shareholders has consented; and

Each of those shareholders consents, including any implied consent pursuant to subsection B, to delivery of a single copy of such notice, report or statement to the shareholders’ common address.

Any shareholder who fails to object by written notice to the corporation, within 60 days of written notice by the corporation of its intention to deliver single copies of notices, reports, or statements to shareholders who share a common address as permitted by subsection A, shall be deemed to have consented to receiving such single copy at the common address, provided that the notice of intention states that consent may be revoked and the method for revoking such consent.

Any consent pursuant to this section shall be revocable by any shareholder who delivers written notice of revocation to the corporation. If such written notice of revocation is delivered, the corporation shall begin providing individual notices, reports, or other statements to the revoking shareholder no later than 30 days after delivery of the written notice of revocation.

History.

2007, c. 165; 2019, c. 734.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection B, substituted “deliver” for “send” preceding “single copies,” and added “provided that the notice of intention states that consent may be revoked and the method for revoking such consent”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (2007).

§ 13.1-611.
Number of shareholders.

For purposes of this chapter, the following identified as a shareholder in a corporation’s current record of shareholders constitutes one shareholder:

Three or fewer co-owners;

A corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, business trust, trust, estate, or other entity; or

The trustees, guardians, custodians, or other fiduciaries of a single trust, estate, or account.

For purposes of this chapter, shareholdings registered in substantially similar names constitute one shareholder if it is reasonable to believe that the names represent the same person.

History.

1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765, in subdivision A 2, inserted “limited liability company,” “limited partnership, business trust.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subdivision A 1, substituted “Three or fewer” for “Two or more.”

§ 13.1-612.
Penalty for signing false document.

It shall be unlawful for any person to sign a document that the person knows is false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the Commission for filing.

Anyone who violates the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-134; 1958, c. 564; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 2019, c. 734.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 substituted “that the person” for “he.”

§ 13.1-613.
Unlawful to transact or offer to transact business as a corporation unless authorized.

It shall be unlawful for any person to transact business in this Commonwealth as a corporation or to offer or advertise to transact business in this Commonwealth as a corporation unless the alleged corporation is either a domestic corporation or a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth. Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-135; 1958, c. 565; 1981, c. 320; 1985, c. 522.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 13.1-614.
Hearing and finality of Commission action; injunctions.

The Commission shall have no power to grant a hearing with respect to any certificate issued by the Commission with respect to any articles filed with the Commission except on a petition by a shareholder filed with the Commission and delivered to the corporation within 30 days after the effective date of the certificate, in which the shareholder asserts that the certification of corporate action contained in the articles contains a misstatement of a material fact as to compliance with statutory requirements, specifying the particulars thereof. After hearing, on notice in writing to the corporation and the shareholder, the Commission shall determine the issues and revoke or refuse to revoke its order accordingly.

No court in or outside of the Commonwealth shall have jurisdiction to enjoin or delay the holding of any meeting of directors or shareholders for the purpose of authorizing or consummating any amendment, correction, merger, share exchange, domestication, conversion, dissolution, or termination of corporate existence or the execution or filing with the Commission of any articles or other documents for such purpose, except pursuant to subsection D of §

13.1-661

or for fraud. No court in or outside of the Commonwealth, except the Supreme Court by way of appeal as authorized by law, shall have jurisdiction to review, reverse, correct, or annul any action of the Commission, within the scope of its authority, with regard to any articles, certificate, order, objection, or petition, or to suspend or delay the execution or operation thereof, or to enjoin, restrain, or interfere with the Commission in the performance of its official duties.

Notwithstanding any provision of subsection A to the contrary, the Commission shall have the power to act upon articles of correction filed by the corporation pursuant to §

13.1-607

or upon a petition filed by a corporation at any time to correct Commission records so as to eliminate the effects of clerical errors and of filings made by a person or persons without authority to act for the corporation, or on the Commission’s own motion to correct Commission records so as to eliminate the effects of clerical errors committed by its staff.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-125; 1956, c. 428; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2008, c. 91; 2010, c. 782; 2015, c. 623; 2019, c. 734.

Cross references.

As to appeals from the State Corporation Commission, see Va. Sup. Ct. Rule 5:21.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 734, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 5 provides: “That until July 1, 2021, the term ‘conversion,’ when used in any provision of the first enactment of this act, shall be construed to mean ‘entity conversion.’ ”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765, in subsection A, substituted “grant a hearing” for “grant a rehearing,” “10 days” for “ten days”; in subsection B, substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth,” inserted “share” following “merger,” inserted “domestication, conversion” following “exchange,” substituted “termination of corporate existence” for “dissolution” and “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 91 substituted “30 days” for “10 days” in the first sentence of subsection A; and added subsection C.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 782 substituted “subsection D” for “subsection C” in subsection B.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 623 inserted “or of its own motion to correct Commission records so as to eliminate the effects of clerical errors committed by its staff” at the end of subsection C.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, inserted “delivered to” preceding “the corporation”; in subsection B, substituted “in or outside of” for “within or without” twice, and inserted “correction” and “dissolution”; in subsection C, inserted “articles of correction filed by the corporation pursuant to §

13.1-607

or upon” and substituted “on the Commission’s” for “of its”; and made stylistic changes.